Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 1

General Provisions

44-8-101. Land in cultivation sufficiently fenced.

Every planter shall make and keep a sufficient fence, of ordinarily sound and substantial material, around the planter's land in cultivation, and so close, for at least two and one-half feet (2½') from the surface of the earth, as to prevent hogs large enough to do damage from passing through the fence.

Code 1858, § 1682 (deriv. Acts 1807, ch. 8, § 1); Acts 1877, ch. 35, §§ 2, 3; Shan., § 2979; Code 1932, § 5202; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1701, 44-9-101.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-8-101 —44-8-112, concerning running at large, was transferred to part 4 of this chapter in 1987.

Cross-References. Cattle guards, title 65, ch. 6, part 3.

Equine activities, liability, title 44, ch. 20.

Vandalism, §39-14-408.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 9; 13 Tenn. Juris., Fences, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Animal Lex, 25 Tenn. L. Rev. 471.

Comparative Legislation. Fences and enclosures:

Ala. Code §3-4-1 et seq.

Ark. Code §2-39-101 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 256.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §69-13-201 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 272.010 et seq.

Va. Code § 55-298.1 et seq.

44-8-102. Various materials constituting sufficient fencing — Rules.

The following types of fence are deemed sufficient:

Stone. A substantial stone fence or wall, three and one-half feet (3½') high;

Plank and post and rail. A post and plank or post and rail fence four feet (4') high;

Rail. A common worm or crooked rail fence five feet (5') high;

Bank. Every bank or other means used as a fence, or part of a fence, equivalent, as an obstruction to stock, to either of the three (3) classes of fence above named;

Planks and wire. Any enclosure made by nailing fast two (2) sound planks, each not less than six inches (6") wide, to posts set firmly in the ground not more than eight feet (8') apart, the bottom plank to be not more than three inches (3") from the ground, and the second plank from the ground not more than four inches (4") from the first; and then by stretching not less than four (4) strands of barbed wire tightly between the posts above the planks, the topmost wire to be not less than four and one-half feet (4½') from the ground, and the bottom wire to be four inches (4") from the topmost plank; the next wire from the bottom one to be nine inches (9") from the topmost plank, and the third wire from the bottom to be twenty-one inches (21") from the topmost plank, the above distance as nearly as practicable;

Osage orange. Bois d' arc or Osage orange fences, wholly of bois d' arc or Osage orange, or in part of bois d' arc or Osage orange, and in part of wire or other material, at least four feet (4') high, and at least eighteen inches (18") across the top and sufficiently close to prevent stock of all kinds from passing through; and

Wire. Any enclosure made by nine (9) smooth, horizontal wires, the bottom and top or first and ninth of which are to be standard number nine (9), and the other seven (7) standard number eleven (11) wires; the first wire to be placed upon or very near the ground; the second three and one-half inches (3½") from the first; the third three and one-half inches (3½") from the second; the fourth four inches (4") from the third; the fifth four inches (4") from the fourth; the sixth six inches (6") from the fifth; the seventh eight inches (8") from the sixth; the eighth ten inches (10") from the seventh; the ninth ten inches (10") from the eighth. The vertical stays or pickets are to be two feet (2') apart between the first or ground wire and the fifth, and from the fifth to the top or ninth wire four feet (4') apart. The posts are to be one (1) rod apart and well stayed at the ends of the fence, so as to keep the fence from sagging.

In addition to subsection (a), sufficient fencing shall include:

A fence constructed from synthetic materials commonly sold for fencing, if such materials are installed pursuant to generally acceptable standards, to confine or restrict the movement of farm animals; and

Systems or devices based on technology generally accepted as appropriate for the confinement or restriction of farm animals.

The commissioner of agriculture may adopt rules and regulations regarding sufficient fencing consistent with this part to provide greater specificity as to the requirements of sufficient fencing. The absence of any such rule or regulation shall not affect the validity or applicability of this section or any section of this part as such sections relate to what constitutes sufficient fencing.

Code 1858, § 1682; Acts 1877, ch. 35, §§ 2, 3; 1883, ch. 46, § 2; 1899, ch. 332, § 1; Shan., § 2980; mod. Code 1932, § 5203; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1702, 44-9-102; Acts 1999, ch. 266, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-8-101 —44-8-112, concerning running at large, was transferred to part 4 of this chapter in 1987.

Law Reviews.

Negligence — Animal Escaping From Slaughter House, 29 Tenn. L. Rev. 586.

44-8-103. Horses, cattle, and mules sufficiently fenced.

The following shall be sufficient and be deemed a lawful fence only as to horses, cattle, and mules: any enclosure made by stretching not less than five (5) strands of barbed wire tightly between posts firmly set in the ground, or between growing trees and posts firmly set in the ground, not more than twenty feet (20') apart; the topmost wire not less than four and one-half feet (4½') from the ground, the bottom wire not less than six inches (6"), and the next to the bottom wire not less than fifteen inches (15") from the ground.

Acts 1883, ch. 46, § 1; Shan., § 2981; Code 1932, § 5204; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1703, 44-9-103.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-8-101 —44-8-112, concerning running at large, was transferred to part 4 of this chapter in 1987.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Fences, § 1.

Cited: Higgins v. Vinson, 549 S.W.2d 161, 1976 Tenn. App. LEXIS 255 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1976).

44-8-104. Paling and wire fence lawful.

The paling and wire fence is made a lawful fence; provided, that the fence is built upon good-sized, substantial posts, set firmly in the ground, not more than twelve feet (12') apart; and provided further, that there is firmly fastened upon these posts two (2) sets double-strand wire, one (1) near the top, the other near the bottom, into which there is woven substantial sawed or split palings, not less than three feet (3') long, with one (1) barbed wire one foot (1') above the paling, or four feet (4') without the wire, and not more than three inches (3") apart; but nothing in this section shall be construed as repealing any statute providing for lawful fences in this state.

Acts 1899, ch. 374, §§ 1, 2; Shan., § 2981a1; Code 1932, § 5205; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1704, 44-9-104.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-8-101 —44-8-112, concerning running at large, was transferred to part 4 of this chapter in 1987.

44-8-105. Three-wire, plank, or slat fence a lawful fence.

In addition, the following shall also be a lawful fence: a fence built on good-sized, substantial posts, set firmly in the ground not more than nine feet (9') apart. The fence shall consist of three (3) barbed wires, or three (3) planks, or three (3) slats running horizontally and fastened firmly to the posts, the first to be eighteen inches (18") from the ground, and the second and third eighteen inches (18") from the first and second respectively, counting from the center of each. The fence may consist entirely of wire strands, or of planks or of slats; or it may be composed of a wire, plank, and slat.

Acts 1891, ch. 92, § 1; Shan., § 2982; Code 1932, § 5206; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1705, 44-9-105.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-8-101 —44-8-112, concerning running at large, was transferred to part 4 of this chapter in 1987.

44-8-106. Damages for trespass — Determination — Recovery.

When any trespass has been committed by horses, cattle, hogs, goats, sheep, or other stock upon the cleared and cultivated ground of any person having the livestock fenced, as is described in §§ 44-8-101 — 44-8-105, the person may complain to a judge of the court of general sessions of the county, who shall cause two (2) discreet and impartial freeholders to be summoned, and with them shall view and examine, on oath of the freeholders to do justice, whether the complainant's fence is a lawful fence, and what damage, if any, the person has sustained by the trespass, and certify the result of this view and examination under the hands and seals of the judge and freeholders, which certificate the judge shall deliver to the complainant. The certificate shall be prima facie evidence of the plaintiff's demand.

The owner of the stock shall be entitled to a hearing, but, if not successful, shall make full satisfaction for the trespass and damages to the party injured, to be recovered as the damages and costs, subject to the right of appeal of either party. To secure the payment of any judgment, execution may be levied upon the stock committing the trespass; and after ten (10) days' notice the stock may be sold to satisfy the judgment so recovered.

Acts 1897, ch. 91, § 1; Shan., § 2982a1; mod. Code 1932, § 5207; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1706; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 2; T.C.A., §44-9-106.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-8-101 —44-8-112, concerning running at large, was transferred to part 4 of this chapter in 1987.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 9.

Law Reviews.

Animals — Liability of Owner for Trespasses, 15 Tenn. L. Rev. 241.

44-8-107. Defense of insufficiency of fence.

If it appears that the fence is insufficient, the owner of the animals shall not be liable to make satisfaction for the damages.

Code 1858, § 1685 (deriv. Acts 1807, ch. 8, § 2); Shan., § 2986; Code 1932, § 5208; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1707, 44-9-107.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-8-101 —44-8-112, concerning running at large, was transferred to part 4 of this chapter in 1987.

Law Reviews.

Animals — Liability of Owner for Trespasses, 15 Tenn. L. Rev. 241.

44-8-108. Injury to animals.

If any person, whose fence is adjudged insufficient, maims, wounds, or kills any such animal, or causes or procures it to be done, that person shall make full satisfaction to the person injured for all damages sustained, to be recovered before any tribunal having cognizance thereof.

Code 1858, § 1686 (deriv. Acts 1807, ch. 8, § 3); Shan., § 2987; Code 1932, § 5209; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1708, 44-9-108.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-8-101 —44-8-112, concerning running at large, was transferred to part 4 of this chapter in 1987.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, §§ 30, 31; 13 Tenn. Juris., Game and Game Laws, § 3.

44-8-109. Notoriously mischievous stock to be confined.

All persons owning notoriously mischievous stock, known to be in the habit of throwing down or jumping fences, shall be required to keep the stock confined upon their own premises.

Acts 1875, ch. 110, § 1; Shan., § 2988; Code 1932, § 5210; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1709, 44-9-109.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-8-101 —44-8-112, concerning running at large, was transferred to part 4 of this chapter in 1987.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 9.

Law Reviews.

Animals — Liability of Owner for Trespasses, 15 Tenn. L. Rev. 241.

Cited: McElroy v. Carter, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 635 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 29, 2006).

44-8-110. Liability of owners of notoriously mischievous stock.

The owners of notoriously mischievous stock shall be liable for all damages done by the stock to enclosure or crops of others.

Acts 1875, ch. 110, § 2; Shan., § 2989; mod. Code 1932, § 5211; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1710, 44-9-110.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-8-101 —44-8-112, concerning running at large, was transferred to part 4 of this chapter in 1987.

44-8-111. Stock liable to execution.

To secure the payment of such damage and costs, executions may be levied upon the stock committing the trespass.

After ten (10) days' notice, the stock may be sold to pay such amount of damages and costs.

Acts 1875, ch. 110, § 3; Shan., § 2990; Code 1932, § 5212; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1711, 44-9-111.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-8-101 —44-8-112, concerning running at large, was transferred to part 4 of this chapter in 1987.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 5.

44-8-112. Pulling and leaving down fence, or opening and leaving open gate, a misdemeanor.

Any person who pulls down the fence of another and leaves the same down, without permission of the owner, or opens and leaves open the gate of another, without permission of the owner, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1875, ch. 71, § 1; Shan., § 3006; mod. Code 1932, § 5227; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1726, 44-9-112; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-8-101 —44-8-112, concerning running at large, was transferred to part 4 of this chapter in 1987.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Cited: Wilson v. White, 20 Tenn. App. 604, 102 S.W.2d 531, 1936 Tenn. App. LEXIS 52 (Tenn. Nov. 7, 1936).

44-8-113. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §44-8-113 (Code 1858, § 1698 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 35, § 3); Shan., § 3013; Code 1932, § 5232; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-201,44-9-113), concerning cotton gins to be enclosed and forfeiture for violation, was repealed by 1999 Acts, ch. 266, § 3.

44-8-114. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §44-8-114 (Code 1858, § 1699 (deriv. Acts 1797, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2; 1822, ch. 32, §§ 1, 2); Shan., § 3014; Code 1932, § 5233; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-202,44-9-114), concerning saltpeter and saltworks to be enclosed and forfeiture for violation, was repealed by 1999 Acts, ch. 266, § 4.